Hawaii statutes.
§482-24 Certificate of registration. (a)
Upon compliance by the applicant with the requirements of this part, the
director shall issue a certificate of registration to the applicant.

(b) The original or a copy certified by the
director of a certificate of registration issued under this part shall be
admissible in evidence as sufficient proof of the registration of a mark in any
action or judicial proceeding in any court of this State. [L 2001, c 15, pt of
§1; am L 2003, c 124, §95]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next